Massachusetts, session 194th, H2196.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after section 215 the following new section:-
Section 215A. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the
following meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
“Harm reduction program”, a program or service that reduces the adverse consequences
of substance use, including use-related morbidity and mortality, stabilizes and improves the
health of people who use substances, and advances public health. Programming or services
provided by a harm reduction program may include, but shall not be limited to: needle exchange;
primary care, including disease prevention and health screenings; access or referral to evidence-
based treatment options; drug testing services; overdose reversal care; supervision of persons
who use pre-obtained substances; and other social support services deemed permissible by the
department.
of 3

“Harm reduction program operators”, entities or individuals directly involved in the
operation, administration or staffing of a harm reduction program, including directors, board
members, consultants, health care providers, service providers, staff and volunteers.
(b) Not later than 1 year after the implementation of a harm reduction program under this
subsection, the department shall report the results of authorized programs pursuant to this section
and any recommendations by filing the report with the clerks of the senate and house of
representatives, the joint committee on mental health, substance use and recovery, the joint
committee on public health and the senate and house committees on ways and means.
(c) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, harm reduction program
operators, individuals who access harm reduction program services, owners, lessors and sub-
lessors of property used for harm reduction programs and state, county and municipal employees
involved in approving or operating harm reduction programs shall, for actions related to the
approval or operation of, or participation in, a harm reduction program, be immune from: (i)
arrest, charge or prosecution, including for attempting, aiding and abetting or conspiracy to
commit a violation, pursuant to sections 32, 32A, 32B, 32C, 32D, 32E, 32I, 34, 40, 43 and 47 of
chapter 94C and chapter 271A; (ii) seizure or forfeiture of data, records, assets or property under
state law; (iii) civil suit, liability or damages alleged to have been sustained by an act or omission
by a harm reduction program operator in the course of providing harm reduction services; (iv)
denial of any right or privilege; and (v) for health care providers, disciplinary action by a
professional licensing board, credentialing restriction, contractual liability, adverse employment
action or denial of any professional privilege; provided, however, that the immunity described in
this subsection shall apply only if the harm reduction program is approved by the department and
of 3

operates in good faith in accordance with this section and regulatory requirements issued by the
department.
(d) Entering or exiting or utilizing a harm reduction program cannot serve as the basis
for, or a fact contributing to the existence of, reasonable suspicion or probable cause to conduct a
search or seizure.
(e) The immunity provided under subsection (c) shall not apply: (i) if the damage was
caused by an act or omission constituting gross negligence or recklessness, conduct with an
intent to harm, discrimination based on race, ethnicity, national origin, religion, disability, sexual
orientation or gender identity, or conduct outside the scope of responsibility of a harm reduction
program employee or volunteer, as determined by the department; (ii) to consumer protection
actions brought by the attorney general; (iii) to false claims actions brought by or on behalf of
the commonwealth; or (iv) privacy violations.
(f) Notwithstanding any general law or special law to the contrary, a person or entity
providing harm reduction services under this section and approved by the department shall not be
required to register their activities pursuant to section 7 of chapter 94C.
(g) The department shall promulgate regulations to implement this section.
SECTION 2. Section 193U of chapter 175 of the general laws, as amended by section 23
of chapter 127 of the acts of 2022, is hereby amended by inserting in the first sentence of the
second paragraph, after the word “that,”, the following words:- “a health care provider provides
services at a harm reduction program, or”.
of 3